Montana, session 2025, LC3737.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Dental services -- provider rates and prohibition on annual cap. (1)
There is no annual payment cap for standard adult dental services provided under the Montana medicaid
program under 53-6-101.
(2) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the provider rate for adult dental services provided under the
Montana medicaid program must be increased, at a minimum, by 10%.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 53, chapter 6, part 1, and the provisions of Title 53, chapter 6, part 1, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****